pt-PT: mecanismo de abertura do canivete: Abertura assistida; Automática (frontal); Automática (botão de pressão); Balisong (borboleta); Aba flipper; Flipper frontal; Bloqueio por alavanca; Manual (duas mãos); Entalhe para a unha; Orifício para o polegar; Pino para o polegar; Outro
ja: ポケットナイフの開閉メカニズム: アシストオープン; オートマチック (OTF); オートマチック (プッシュボタン); バリソン (バタフライ); フリッパータブ; フロントフリッパー; レバーロック; マニュアル (両手); ネイルニック; サムホール; サムスタッド; その他
th: กลไกการเปิดมีดพับ: เปิดแบบผ่อนแรงช่วย; อัตโนมัติ (เปิดแบบดีดออกด้านหน้า); อัตโนมัติ (ปุ่มกด); บาลิซอง (มีดปีกผีเสื้อ); แท็บฟลิปเปอร์; ฟลิปเปอร์ด้านหน้า; ก้านล็อค; แมนนวล (สองมือ); ร่องเปิดด้วยเล็บ; รูเปิดด้วยนิ้วโป้ง; หมุดเปิดด้วยนิ้วโป้ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Zakmes openingsmechanisme: Ondersteunde opening; Automatisch (out-the-front); Automatisch (drukknop); Balisong (vlindermes); Flippertab; Frontflipper; Leverlock; Handmatig (tweehandig); Nagelgleuf; Duimgat; Duimsteun; Overig
ko: 포켓 나이프 개폐 메커니즘: 반자동 오프닝; 자동(전면 돌출형); 자동(푸시 버튼); 발리송(나비); 플리퍼 탭; 프론트 플리퍼; 레버록; 수동(양손); 네일 닉; 섬 홀; 섬 스터드; 기타
sk-SK: Mechanizmus otvárania vreckového noža: Asistované otváranie; Automatické (vyskakovacie dopredu); Automatické (na tlačidlo); Balisong (motýlik); Flipper; Predný flipper; Zámok Leverlock; Manuálne (obojručné); Zárez na necht; Otvor na palec; Kolík na palec; Iné
pl: Mechanizm otwierania scyzoryka: Ze wspomaganiem otwierania; Automatyczny (OTF); Automatyczny (na przycisk); Balisong (nóż motylkowy); Fliper; Przedni fliper; Blokada dźwigniowa (leverlock); Ręczny (oburęczny); Wycięcie na paznokieć; Otwór pod kciuk; Kołek pod kciuk; Inny
sv: Öppningsmekanism för fickkniv: Assisterad öppning; Automatisk (OTF); Automatisk (tryckknapp); Balisong (butterfly); Flipperflik; Frontflipper; Spaklås; Manuell (tvåhands); Nagelskåra; Tumhål; Tumstift; Övrigt
fi: Taskuveitsen avausmekanismi: Jousiavusteinen; Automaattinen (suoraan ulos); Automaattinen (painonappi); Perhosveitsi (balisong); Flipperi; Etuflipperi; Vipulukko; Manuaalinen (kaksikätinen); Kynsilovi; Peukaloreikä; Peukalotappi; Muu
sl-SI: Mehanizem odpiranja žepnega noža: Polavtomatsko odpiranje (assisted); Avtomatsko odpiranje (spredaj - OTF); Avtomatsko odpiranje (gumb); Balisong (metuljček); Zatič za odpiranje (flipper); Sprednji zatič za odpiranje (front flipper); Vzmetni mehanizem z ročico (leverlock); Ročno (dvoročno); Utor za noht; Odprtina za palec; Zatič za palec; Drugo
zh-TW: 折疊刀開啟機構: 輔助開啟; 自動 (前方彈出); 自動 (按鈕); 蝴蝶刀; 快開鰭片; 前置鰭片; 槓桿鎖; 手動 (雙手); 指甲扣; 拇指孔; 拇指柱; 其他
ru: Механизм открытия карманного ножа: Полуавтоматический; Автоматический (фронтальный выброс); Автоматический (кнопочный); Балисонг (бабочка); Флиппер; Фронтальный флиппер; Замок-флажок; Ручной (открывание двумя руками); Ногтевой зацеп; Отверстие для большого пальца; Шпенек; Другое
da: Åbningsmekanisme til lommekniv: Assisteret åbning; Automatisk (frontåbning); Automatisk (trykknap); Balisong (butterfly); Flipperfane; Front-flipper; Håndtagslås; Manuel (tohånds); Neglerille; Tommelfingerhul; Tommelfingerknop; Andet
tr: Cep bıçağı açma mekanizması: Destekli açılış; Otomatik (önden çıkmalı); Otomatik (basmalı düğme); Balisong (kelebek); Parmak tırnağı; Ön flipper; Manivelalı kilit; Manuel (iki el); Tırnak çentiği; Başparmak deliği; Başparmak pimi; Diğer
hu: Zsebkés nyitási mechanizmusa: Rásegítéses nyitás; Automata (előre ugró penge); Automata (nyomógombos); Balisong (pillangókés); Flipper (nyitófül); Front flipper; Karos (leverlock); Manuális (kétkezes); Körömvájat; Nyitófurat; Nyitószemölcs; Egyéb
it: Meccanismo di apertura del coltello tascabile: Apertura assistita; Automatica (a scatto frontale); Automatica (pulsante); Balisong (a farfalla); Levetta (flipper tab); Levetta frontale (front flipper); A scatto (leverlock); Manuale (a due mani); Fessura per l'unghia; Foro per il pollice; Perno per il pollice; Altro
vi: Cơ chế mở dao bỏ túi: Hỗ trợ mở; Tự động (bật lưỡi thẳng); Tự động (nút bấm); Balisong (dao bướm); Chốt lật; Chốt lật phía trước; Khóa đòn bẩy; Thủ công (hai tay); Rãnh móng tay; Lỗ xỏ ngón cái; Chốt ngón cái; Khác
es: Mecanismo de apertura de la navaja de bolsillo: Apertura asistida; Automática (frontal); Automática (botón de presión); Balisong (mariposa); Pestaña flipper; Flipper frontal; Bloqueo de palanca; Manual (a dos manos); Muesca para uña; Agujero para el pulgar; Perno para el pulgar; Otro
ro-RO: Mecanism de deschidere a briceagului de buzunar: Deschidere asistată; Automată (acționare frontală); Automată (buton integrat); Balisong (tip fluture); Clapetă (flipper); Clapetă frontală (front flipper); Leverlock (cu pârghie); Manuală (două mâini); Fantă pentru unghie; Orificiu pentru degetul mare; Știft pentru degetul mare; Altele
hr-HR: Mehanizam za otvaranje džepnog noža: Potpomognuto otvaranje; Automatsko (kroz prednji dio); Automatsko (pritisni gumb); Balisong (leptir); Okidač (flipper); Prednji okidač (front flipper); Polužno zaključavanje (leverlock); Ručno (s dvije ruke); Urez za nokat; Rupa za palac; Izbočina za palac; Ostalo
cs: Mechanismus otevírání kapesního nože: Asistované otvírání; Automatické (vyskakovací dopředu); Automatické (tlačítkové); Motýlek (balisong); Flipper (kolíček); Přední flipper; Páková pojistka (leverlock); Manuální (obouruční); Zářez pro nehet; Otvor pro palec; Kolíček pro palec; Jiné
fr: Mécanisme d’ouverture du couteau de poche: Ouverture assistée; Automatique (frontale); Automatique (bouton-poussoir); Balisong (papillon); Flipper; Front flipper; Leverlock; Manuelle (à deux mains); Onglet; Trou pour le pouce; Ergot pour le pouce; Autre
en: Pocket knife opening mechanism: Assisted opening; Automatic (out-the-front); Automatic (push-button); Balisong (butterfly); Flipper tab; Front flipper; Leverlock; Manual (two-hand); Nail nick; Thumb hole; Thumb stud; Other
lt-LT: Sulankstomo peilio atidarymo mechanizmas: Pusiau automatinis; Automatinis (iššokantis į priekį); Automatinis (mygtukinis); Balisongas (drugelis); Atlenkimo svirtelė („flipper“); Priekinė atlenkimo svirtelė; Svirtinis užraktas; Rankinis (dviejų rankų); Įpjova nagui; Anga nykščiui; Smeigtukas nykščiui; Kita
pt-BR: Canivete mecanismo de abertura: Abertura assistida; Automático (frontal); Automático (botão); Balisong (canivete borboleta); Pino flipper; Flipper frontal; Trava de alavanca; Manual (duas mãos); Ranhura para unha; Orifício para polegar; Pino para polegar; Outro
de: Öffnungsmechanismus des Taschenmessers: Öffnungsunterstützt; Automatisch (Out-the-Front); Automatisch (Druckknopf); Balisong (Butterfly); Flipper-Tab; Front-Flipper; Hebelschloss; Manuell (zweihändig); Nagelhau; Daumenloch; Daumenpin; Sonstige
bg-BG: Механизъм за отваряне на джобно ножче: Асистирано отваряне; Автоматично (фронтално); Автоматично (с бутон); Балисонг (пеперуда); Флипър; Преден флипър; Лостова ключалка; Ръчно (с две ръце); Жлеб за нокът; Отвор за палеца; Щифт за палеца; Други
el: Μηχανισμός ανοίγματος σουγιά: Υποβοηθούμενο άνοιγμα; Αυτόματο (από μπροστά); Αυτόματο (με κουμπί); Balisong (πεταλούδα); Γλωσσίδι flipper; Μπροστινό flipper; Κλείδωμα με μοχλό; Χειροκίνητο (με δύο χέρια); Εγκοπή νυχιού; Οπή αντίχειρα; Πείρος αντίχειρα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 折刀开合机制: 辅助开启; 自动（直跳）; 自动（按压式）; 蝴蝶刀; 快开鳍; 前拨快开鳍; 杠杆锁; 手动（双手）; 指甲扣; 拇指孔; 拇指柱; 其他
nb: Åpningsmekanisme for lommekniv: Assistert åpning; Automatisk (OTF); Automatisk (trykknapp); Balisong (sommerfugl); Flipper-tapp; Front-flipper; Spaklås; Manuell (tohånds); Neglespor; Tommelhull; Tommeltapp; Annet